Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6231.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 388a. As used in sections 388a to 388f: (a) "Camp Grayling" means the national all-domain warfighting center, which includes Camp Grayling joint maneuver training center, the Alpena combat readiness training center, the live fire range in Lake Huron, and related lands, facilities, and equipment under the supervision and control of the adjutant general. (b) "Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs. (c) "Facility revenue" means the fees, rents, charges, lease payments, concessions, license fees, revenue-sharing arrangements, and other receipts derived from the operation, use, leasing, or licensing of Camp Grayling, less any required cost-share remittances or payments owed to the federal government arising from that operation, use, leasing, or licensing. (d) "Fund" means the Camp Grayling improvement fund created in section 388b. (e) "Improvement" includes the planning, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, maintenance, repair, modernization, and environmental mitigation and remediation of and utility, infrastructure, and equipment upgrades for Camp Grayling. Sec. 388b. (1) The Camp Grayling improvement fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall establish the fund as a restricted revenue fund. The fund shall receive all facility revenue attributable to Camp Grayling and any gifts, grants, or other money received for Camp Grayling improvements. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (5) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. Money or assets of the fund may be invested as permitted for surplus funds of this state. The treasurer shall keep the fund's money in accounts that are separately identified and accounted. (6) The department may expend money from the fund, on appropriation and in amounts not to exceed the available balance in the fund, for the following purposes at Camp Grayling: (a) Capital improvements and major maintenance. (b) Environmental mitigation or remediation, including PFAS or other contaminant investigation and response, and compliance with state or federal permits. Expenditures for environmental remediation under this subdivision do not constitute a waiver of any federal responsibility or liability for environmental contamination at Camp Grayling. (c) Utility, road, communications, or site infrastructure upgrades. (d) Range safety, training support, and lodging facility improvements. (e) Planning, design, and project management costs reasonably related to the improvements authorized by this section. (f) Support for defense or aerospace industries. (7) Expenditures from the fund must be made in accordance with applicable procurement, contracting, and construction laws and rules. (8) Expenditures and contracting under this section and sections 388c to 388f must be conducted consistent with the terms of any master cooperative agreement between this state and the National Guard Bureau and applicable federal grant regulations. Sec. 388c. (1) The department may charge and collect fees, rents, charges, and other facility revenue associated with the operation or use of Camp Grayling. The department shall deposit all facility revenue in the fund. (2) The department shall maintain auditable records of deposits and expenditures and shall comply with the uniform accounting requirements applicable to state agencies. (3) In addition to the authority provided elsewhere in law, the department may enter into leases of Camp Grayling lands, facilities, or equipment, including ground leases, concession agreements, or licenses that authorize a lessee or licensee to construct, operate, and maintain facilities, and may act as lessor, lessee, licensor, or licensee, subject to attorney general approval as to legal form, compliance with applicable law, and any required approvals from the National Guard Bureau or the United States Property and Fiscal Officer. Sec. 388d. (1) Not later than March 31 of each year, the department shall submit to the governor, the senate majority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the house and senate appropriations committees a report detailing the following for the preceding fiscal year: (a) Total deposits to the fund by source category. (b) Total expenditures by project and purpose. (c) A list of Camp Grayling improvement projects underway or completed, including timelines and amounts. (d) Any interlocal agreements, leases, or major contracts entered into or amended under section 388c. (2) The department shall post the report described in subsection (1) on the department's website. Sec. 388e. (1) To facilitate the operation, support, improvement, and revenue generation associated with Camp Grayling, the department may solicit bids and proposals from financially responsible vendors of goods, construction, and services, including data processing equipment and services, and may enter into contracts for those goods and services. Contracts under this subsection are subject to approval by the state administrative board to the extent required under applicable law. (2) Subject to the applicable laws relating to public contracts, the department may enter into contracts for the operation of any revenue-generating use of Camp Grayling, or any part thereof, and into contracts for the promotion of authorized uses at Camp Grayling. (3) A contract, lease, or license awarded or entered into by the department under this section must not be assigned, subleased, or sublicensed by the other contracting party except with the department's prior written approval. (4) The department may adopt procurement procedures tailored to the activities authorized by sections 388a to 388f to achieve best value and timely delivery, including the use of competitive sealed bids or proposals, requests for quotations, and other competitive methods consistent with applicable law. The department may prequalify vendors for categories of Camp Grayling-related goods or services and may establish master agreements for recurring needs. (5) The department shall include, in contracts entered into under this section, commercially reasonable insurance, bonding, and indemnification requirements to protect the interests of this state. Sec. 388f. (1) The activities authorized by sections 388a to 388e, including, but not limited to, the operation, use, leasing, fee collection, contracting, and improvements associated with Camp Grayling, are governmental functions as that term is defined in section 1 of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1401. (2) For the purposes of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1401 to 691.1419, the activities authorized by sections 388a to 388e are not considered proprietary functions under section 13 of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1413. (3) This section does not waive, limit, or otherwise affect any immunity, defense, or limitation of liability available to a governmental agency or its officers, employees, or volunteers under section 7 of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1407, or other applicable law. This section does not create a cause of action or enlarge any existing cause of action. (4) This section, and sections 388a to 388e, do not alter public access, hunting or fishing rights, or land-use permit conditions on state forest lands administered by the department of natural resources. The department shall continue to comply with any memorandum of understanding or permit conditions governing the use of state forest lands adjacent to Camp Grayling. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after enactment.